Oklahoma, session 2026, SB795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-161.1 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Before annual enrollment of a student in a public school


district, the school shall provide information to the parent or


guardian who is enrolling the student concerning all the education


options available to students within this state, including:


1. The education options under the Education Open Transfer Act,


including:


a. the ability for Oklahoma students to transfer from


school districts other than their resident school

Req. No. 808 Page 1


district pursuant to Sections 8-101.2, 8-103, 8-103.1,


8-103.2, 8-113 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


and


b. the ability for Oklahoma students to transfer to


different school sites within their resident school


district pursuant to Section 8-114 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


2. The education opportunities available under the Oklahoma


Parental Choice Tax Credit Act, including:


a. the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax Credit for other


means of education pursuant to Sections 10-105 and 28-


101 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


b. the Oklahoma School Choice Tax Credit for private


school tuition and fees pursuant to Section 28-101 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. The education opportunities available under the Oklahoma


Charter Schools Act, including:


a. the availability of statewide virtual charter school


enrollment within the state, and


b. the existence of physical charter schools within the


school district and all directly adjacent school


district boundaries; and





Req. No. 808 Page 2


4. The education opportunities available under the Lindsey


Nicole Henry Scholarship for Students with Disabilities Program


pursuant to Section 13-101.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. This information shall be posted on the school district


website throughout the year, updated yearly as new education options


arise, and be readily available in school office premises for


distribution to parents inquiring about their education options.


C. The State Department of Education shall develop a document


including all information required by this section that applies to


all public school students within the state for the dissemination of


information required by this section and shall make it available to


school districts through its website or other means necessary.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-808 BG 1/19/2025 5:43:28 AM











Req. No. 808 Page 3